North Carolina, session 2025, HB144.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Section 4 of Article IX of the Constitution of North Carolina reads
as rewritten:
"Sec. 4. State Board of Education.
(1) Board. The State Board of Education shall consist of the Lieutenant Governor, the
Treasurer, and eleven members appointed by the Governor, subject to confirmation by the
General Assembly in joint session. The General Assembly shall divide the State into eight
educational districts. Of the appointive members of the Board, one shall be appointed from each
of the eight educational districts and three shall be appointed from the State at large.
Appointments shall be for overlapping terms of eight years. Appointments to fill vacancies shall
be made by the Governor for the unexpired terms and shall not be subject to confirmation.the
Superintendent of Public Instruction, and a number of elected members equal to the membership
of the House of Representatives of the Congress of the United States apportioned to the State by
federal law.
(2) Superintendent of Public Instruction. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall
be the secretary chair and chief administrative officer of the State Board of Education.
(3) Elected members. Elected members of the State Board of Education shall be elected
to overlapping four-year terms of office. Elected members shall be elected from districts
established by the General Assembly by the voters of each district in the manner prescribed by
law. Vacancies for elected members shall be filled for the remainder of the term of office in the
manner prescribed by law by the General Assembly."
SECTION 1.(b) Subsection (5) of Section 22 of Article II of the Constitution of
North Carolina reads as rewritten:
"(5) Other exceptions. Every bill:
(a) In which the General Assembly makes an appointment or appointments to
public office and which contains no other matter;
(b) Revising the senate districts and the apportionment of Senators among those
districts and containing no other matter;
(c) Revising the representative districts and the apportionment of Representatives
among those districts and containing no other matter; or
*H144-v-2*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(d) Revising the districts for the election of members of the House of
Representatives of the Congress of the United States and the apportionment
of Representatives among those districts and containing no other
matter,matter; or
(e) Revising the districts for the election of members of the State Board of
Education and the apportionment of Board members among those districts and
containing no other matter,
shall be read three times in each house before it becomes law and shall be signed by the presiding
officers of both houses."
SECTION 2. The amendment set out in Section 1 of this act shall be submitted to
the qualified voters of the State at a statewide general election to be held in November 2026,
which election shall be conducted under the laws then governing elections in the State. Ballots,
voting systems, or both may be used in accordance with Chapter 163 of the General Statutes. The
question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
A constitutional amendment providing for the following changes to the State Board
of Education, beginning January 1, 2028:
(1) The Superintendent of Public Instruction will serve as a member and chair of
the State Board of Education.
(2) Except for the Council of State members serving on the State Board of
Education, the voters of the district will elect all members of the State Board
of Education to four-year terms.
(3) State Board of Education members will be elected from districts established
by the General Assembly. Bills revising those districts will become law upon
ratification.
(4) All vacancies for elected positions on the State Board of Education will be
filled in a manner provided by law."
SECTION 3. If a majority of the votes cast on the question are in favor of the
amendment set out in Section 1 of this act, the State Board of Elections shall certify the
amendment to the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall enroll the amendment so
certified among the permanent records of that office.
SECTION 4. If the amendment is approved by the qualified voters as provided in
this act, Section 1 of this act becomes effective January 1, 2028, and applies to terms of office
beginning January 1, 2029. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 House Bill 144-Second Edition